Hawaii statutes.
§183D-40 Permit; authority under.
After first having obtained a permit from the department, a licensee may obtain
any number of game birds from any state game farm or from city park boards from
another county, state, or foreign jurisdiction, or, with the consent of the
department, transfer to another licensee any game bird taken or secured under
this chapter. A licensee, after obtaining a permit may sell, give away, or
dispose of the eggs of any game bird, lawfully in the licensee's possession,
for propagation purposes only. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next